Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.040

Notice of text of petition, meeting where will be considered.

If the board of county commissioners, with the assistance of other appropriate county officers, finds the petition filed under RCW 36.95.030 satisfies the requirements of that section, it shall cause the text of the petition to be published once a week for at least three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the petition is presented. With the publication of the petition there shall be published a notice of the time, date, and place of the public meeting of the county commissioners when the petition will be considered, stating that persons interested may appear and be heard.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 4.]